apertium-bel.bel.dix
    <pardef n="люб/оў__n_f_nn">
      <e><p><l>оў</l><r>оў<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>оў</l><r>оў<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ові</l><r>оў<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ові</l><r>оў<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ові</l><r>оў<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>оўю</l><r>оў<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="надвор'/е__n_nt_nn">
      <e><p><l>е</l><r>е<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>я</l><r>е<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ю</l><r>е<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>е</l><r>е<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ем</l><r>е<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>і</l><r>е<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="/возера__n_nt_nn">
      <e><p><l>возер</l><r>возера<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/></r></p><par n="BASE__nnsg1"/></e>
      <e><p><l>возерам</l><r>возера<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>возере</l><r>возера<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>азёры</l><r>возера<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>азёр</l><r>возера<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>азёрам</l><r>возера<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>азёра</l><r>возера<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>азёрамі</l><r>возера<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>азёрах</l><r>возера<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="сабак/а__n_m_aa">
      <e><p><l></l><r>а<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/></r></p><par n="BASE__nmsg5"/></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r>а<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/></r></p><par n="BASE__nmpl5"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ах</l><r>а<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="дзяўч/ынка__n_f_aa">
      <e><p><l>ынка</l><r>ынка<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ынкы</l><r>ынка<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ынкы</l><r>ынка<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ынку</l><r>ынка<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ынкай</l><r>ынка<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ынкы</l><r>ынка<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>аткі</l><r>ынка<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>атак</l><r>ынка<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>аткам</l><r>ынка<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>атак</l><r>ынка<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>аткамі</l><r>ынка<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>атках</l><r>ынка<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="кош/ка__n_f_aa">
      <e><p><l>ка</l><r>ка<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>кi</l><r>ка<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>цы</l><r>ка<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ку</l><r>ка<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>кай</l><r>ка<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>цэ</l><r>ка<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>кі</l><r>ка<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ак</l><r>ка<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>кам</l><r>ка<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ак</l><r>ка<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>камі</l><r>ка<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ках</l><r>ка<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="дз/іця__n_nt_aa">
      <e><p><l>іця</l><r>іця<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>іцяці</l><r>іця<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>іцяці</l><r>іця<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>іця</l><r>іця<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>іцём</l><r>іця<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>іцяці</l><r>іця<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>еці</l><r>іця<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>яцей</l><r>іця<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ецям</l><r>іця<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>яцей</l><r>іця<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ецьмі</l><r>іця<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ецях</l><r>іця<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="гульн/я__n_f_nn">
      <e><p><l>я</l><r>я<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ю</l><r>я<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>і</l><r>я<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>і</l><r>я<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ёй</l><r>я<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>і</l><r>я<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>і</l><r>я<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>і</l><r>я<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>яў</l><r>я<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ям</l><r>я<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ямі</l><r>я<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ях</l><r>я<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="любоў"><i>люб</i><par n="люб/оў__n_f_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="возера"><i></i><par n="/возера__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="надвор'е"><i>надвор'</i><par n="надвор'/е__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="дзяўчынка"><i>дзяўч</i><par n="дзяўч/ынка__n_f_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="сабака"><i>сабак</i><par n="сабак/а__n_m_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="сабачка"><i>сабачк</i><par n="сабак/а__n_m_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="кошка"><i>кош</i><par n="кош/ка__n_f_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="дзіця"><i>дз</i><par n="дз/іця__n_nt_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="гульня"><i>гульн</i><par n="гульн/я__n_f_nn"/></e>
